Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
346D

[LONG-TERM
CARE]

Section

346D-1 Definitions

346D-1.5 Medicaid reimbursement equity

346D-2 Establishment of medicaid home and
community-based

waiver programs

346D-3 Determination of eligibility for
participation in a

waiver program

346D-4 Provision of services

346D-4.5 Needs allowance; waiver program
individuals

346D-5, 6 Repealed

346D-7 Rules

346D-8 Personnel exempt

Note

Long-term care policy goals and guidelines. L 2008, c 224,
§§2, 3.

Nursing facility sustainability program (repealed June 30,
2016 and December 31, 2016). L 2012, c 156; L 2013, c 142; L 2014, c 124; L
2015, c 69.

Cross References

Coordination and development of caregiver support services,
see §349-15.

Dependent elder abuse; suits by the State; civil penalties,
see §28-94.

Nursing facility sustainability program, see chapter 346F.

Law Journals and Reviews

Implementing Olmstead v. L.C.: Defining "Effectively
Working" Plans for "Reasonably Paced" Wait Lists for Medicaid
Home and Community-Based Services Waiver Programs. 23 UH L. Rev. 731 (2001).

Case Notes

Where plaintiffs challenged State's administration of its
medicaid home and community based services for the developmentally disabled or
mentally retarded program (HCBS-MR), defendants' motion for partial summary
judgment granted to extent it covered (1) plaintiffs' claim that defendants
violated "reasonable promptness" provision of the medicaid statute,
42 U.S.C. §1396a(a)(8), by denying plaintiffs HCBS-MR services, as to filled
slots; and (2) plaintiffs' claims based on 42 U.S.C. §1396n(c)(2)(A) or (C)
since plaintiffs were not entitled to HCBS-MR services under the medicaid
statute once slots were filled by other eligible individuals. 114 F. Supp. 2d
1017 (1999).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next